Massachusetts, session 194th, S2253.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of Chapter 187 of the Acts of 2016 is hereby amended by striking
(b) and replacing with the following section:
(b)Pursuant to Section 23 of Chapter 176 of the Acts of 2022, each transportation
network company shall submit to the director of the division established in the number of rides
from the previous month that originated in each city or town and the amount collected from
rider-assessments. Notwithstanding any other law, a rider-assessment is to be charged as follows:
(i) 6.25% of the total fare for a pre-arranged ride
(ii) A rider assessment shall not apply to a pre-arranged ride requested or selected by a
rider who has requested or selected the pre-arranged ride through a program established by a
of 3

public entity to provide transportation network services to individuals, including those who are
eligible for paratransit services.
Not later than June 30, the director shall post on the division’s website the aggregate
number of rides from the previous calendar year originating within each city or town.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of Mass General Laws Chapter 159A½ is amended by adding the
following definitions:
“For-Hire Transportation Trip”, a ride in which, prior to the commencement of the ride, a
passenger requests a pre-arranged ride through the transportation network company’s digital
network as a single passenger between points chosen by the passenger, regardless of the number
of stops. This shall not include transportation provided by, or pursuant to a contract with a state
agency or an institution.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of Chapter 159A½ as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended as follows:
(d) A transportation network company shall provide clear and conspicuous transportation
fare estimates to riders at all times, including during surge pricing, high volume and demand
times; provided however, the per-ride assessment shall not apply to a pre-arranged ride requested
or selected by a rider who has requested or selected the pre arranged ride through a program
established by a public entity to provide transportation network services to individuals, including
those who are eligible for paratransit services.. Fare estimates shall include a clear rate estimate
or the amount of price increase resulting from surge pricing or increased demand and shall show
the price difference between the cost of a shared-ride and a single-occupancy ride.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 10 of Chapter 159A½ as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended as follows:
(a) A municipality that accepts the provisions of this section, may impose a congestion
assessment of no more than $2.25 per ride. These funds would be dedicated for municipal
investment in public transportation, bicycle and pedestrian investments, and electric vehicle
charging infrastructure.
(b) No municipality or other local state entity, except the Massachusetts Port Authority,
may: (i) require any additional license for a transportation network company or transportation
network driver; or (ii) subject a transportation network company to the municipality’s or other
local or state entity’s rates or other requirements, including but not limited to entry or operational
requirements; provided, however, that a municipality or other local or state entity may regulate
traffic flow and traffic patterns to ensure public safety and convenience.
SECTION 5. Section 18 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. Section 10 is hereby repealed.
of 3